Maine, session 132, LD347.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §407 is enacted to read:
§407. Revenue allocation to municipalities
1. Local Government Cannabis Revenue Fund established. In recognition of the
local costs of regulation and enforcement with respect to the activities associated with the
regulation of adult use cannabis under this chapter and to assist in offsetting negative effects
on local resources, there is established the Local Government Cannabis Revenue Fund,
referred to in this section as "the fund."
2. Fund sources. The fund receives money transferred to the fund pursuant to Title 36,
section 1818, subsection 1 and Title 36, section 4925, subsection 1.
3. Distribution of funds. In accordance with this subsection, the Treasurer of State
shall transfer the balance in the fund, less the actual costs of administering the fund, on the
20th day of each month. Money in the fund must be distributed to each municipality in
which the legislative body has voted to adopt a new ordinance, amend an existing ordinance
or approve a warrant article allowing a cannabis establishment within the municipality, in
proportion to the ratio of state revenues generated by all cannabis establishments operating
within the municipality to the state revenues generated by all cannabis establishments
operating within the State.
4. Unorganized and deorganized areas. For purposes of municipal cannabis revenue
distribution pursuant to this section, unorganized and deorganized areas must be treated as
if they are municipalities.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1818, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §5 and c. 669, §5, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§1818. Tax on adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products
All sales tax revenue collected pursuant to section 1811 on the sale of adult use
cannabis and adult use cannabis products must be deposited into the General Fund, except
that:
1. Transfer to Local Government Cannabis Revenue Fund. On or before the 10th
day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer to the Local Government Cannabis
Revenue Fund, established under Title 28-B, section 407, 12% of the sales tax revenue
received by the assessor during the preceding month pursuant to section 1811; and
2. Transfer to Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-
in Fund. On or before the last day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer to the
Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund, established
under Title 28-B, section 1101, 12% of the difference between the sales tax revenue
received by the assessor during the preceding month pursuant to section 1811 and the
amount of the transfer made pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §4925, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §6 and c. 669, §5, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§4925. Application of excise tax revenue
Page 1 - 132LR0375(01)

All excise tax revenue collected by the assessor on the sale of adult use cannabis
pursuant to this chapter must be deposited into the General Fund, except that:
1. Transfer to Local Government Cannabis Revenue Fund. On or before the 10th
day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer to the Local Government Cannabis
Revenue Fund, established under Title 28-B, section 407, 12% of the excise tax revenue
received by the assessor during the preceding month pursuant to this chapter; and
2. Transfer to Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-
in Fund. On or before the last day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer to the
Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund, established
under Title 28-B, section 1101, 12% of the difference between the excise tax revenue
received by the assessor during the preceding month pursuant to this chapter and the
amount of the transfer made pursuant to subsection 1.